District of Columbia statutes.
38-171

District of Columbia Public Schools agency; establishment.

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council establishes the District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) as a separate cabinet-level agency, subordinate to the Mayor, within the executive branch of the District of Columbia government.

History

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 102, 54 DCR 4102

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-753.02, § 38-755.02, § 38-781.01, § 38-821.01, and § 38-2601.02.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4003 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4082 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4003 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4082 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Mayor's Orders

Final Action on Closings and Consolidations of District of Columbia Public Schools, see Mayor’s Order 2011-42, February 11, 2011 ( 58 DCR 1497).

Editor's Notes

Applicability: Section 107 of Law 17-9 provided that this title shall apply upon Congressional enactment of Title IX. Congress enacted the provisions of Title IX in Pub. L. 110-33, approved June 1, 2007.